California, session 20252026, AB1119.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The State of California has established a goal of working toward one system of education for all pupils with and without disabilities, reflecting the value that all pupils are general education pupils first. To this end, the state has established goals, made investments, and provided technical assistance and support to increase inclusion, access to grade level content, and belonging of pupils with disabilities in all educational settings.(2) The state has also had a shortage of education specialists for many decades, leading pupils to be served by individuals lacking full preparation.(3) Dual credentialing, which permits teachers to instruct all pupils in multiple settings and subject areas holds great promise as a strategy for increasing rates of inclusion and equipping teachers to meet the needs of a diverse group of learners. Dual credentialing also supports the staffing of co-taught classrooms, which is a highly effective strategy for pupils with and without disabilities.(4) California recently reformed its credentialing system to establish a “common trunk” of preparation that single subject or multiple subject credential candidates and education specialist credential candidates complete. This reformed system also provides an opportunity for programs to make obtaining a second credential more efficient.(5) California also recently established alternate routes to a high school diploma for pupils with disabilities, which will provide all pupils the opportunity to earn a high school diploma. This policy creates an expectation that all pupils, including those with extensive support needs, will have access to content required for graduation, and underscores the need for all teachers to have the capacity to deliver high-quality first instruction in grade-level content, regardless of the setting the pupil is in.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide efficient and accessible routes for educators to become dually credentialed and to ensure that input from relevant stakeholders is sought and considered in the process of developing and establishing routes to become dually credentialed.SEC. 2. Section 44238.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:44238.5. (a) On or before March 1, 2027, the commission shall, with input from the education field, develop, establish, and promulgate, through the regulatory process pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, efficient routes for the following:(1) Teacher candidates to obtain a multiple subject credential, a single subject credential, or a PK–3 early childhood education specialist instruction credential, and an education specialist credential, known as dual credentialing.(2) Existing teachers who hold a multiple subject credential, a single subject credential, or a PK–3 early childhood education specialist instruction credential to obtain an education specialist credential.(3) Existing teachers who hold an education specialist credential to obtain a multiple subject credential, a single subject credential, or a PK–3 early childhood education specialist instruction credential.(b) In developing efficient routes pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall do all of the following:(1) Review current routes that holders of multiple subject and single subject credentials have to earn additional credentials and supplementary authorizations, pursuant to the commission’s authorization provided in subdivision (e) of Section 44225.(2) Determine which content of preparation in multiple subject and single subject programs and education specialist programs could satisfy the requirements for both credentials to create efficiencies toward earning dual credentials.(3) Review whether supplementary authorizations to an existing credential, authorizing the teaching of pupils with or without disabilities, could be developed.(4) Identify barriers and opportunities for teachers to become dually credentialed and barriers and opportunities for programs of preparation to prepare dually credentialed teachers.(5) Review any readily available information about other states’ routes to dual credentialing through programs of preparation or for existing holders of credentials specified in subdivision (a).(6) Identify any necessary statutory changes to establish routes to dual credentialing.